Florida, session 2026, SB800.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âPresent subsection (4) of section 471.033, 10 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5), and a new 11 subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 12 471.033âDisciplinary proceedings.â 13 (4)âNotwithstanding subsection (3), a person who violates 14 this section by engaging in the unlicensed practice of 15 engineering, upon a second or subsequent violation, is subject 16 to a fine imposed by the department which increases as follows: 17 (a)âFor a second violation, a fine of $10,000. 18 (b)âFor a third violation, a fine of $15,000. 19 (c)âFor a fourth violation, a fine of $20,000. 20 (d)âFor a fifth and any subsequent violation, a fine of 21 $25,000. 22 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.